Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 1. Appointment.

§ 64.2-2000.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Advance directive”
shall have the same meaning as provided in §

54.1-2982

.

“Annual report”
means the report required to be filed by a guardian pursuant to §

64.2-2020

.

“Conservator”
means a person appointed by the court who is responsible for managing the estate and financial affairs of an incapacitated person and, where the context plainly indicates, includes a “limited conservator” or a “temporary conservator.” “Conservator” includes (i) a local or regional program designated by the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services as a public conservator pursuant to Article 6 (§

51.5-149

et seq.) of Chapter 14 of Title 51.5 or (ii) any local or regional tax-exempt charitable organization established pursuant to § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code to provide conservatorial services to incapacitated persons. Such tax-exempt charitable organization shall not be a provider of direct services to the incapacitated person. If a tax-exempt charitable organization has been designated by the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services as a public conservator, it may also serve as a conservator for other individuals.

“Estate”
includes both real and personal property.

“Facility”
means a state or licensed hospital, training center, psychiatric hospital, or other type of residential or outpatient mental health or mental retardation facility. When modified by the word “state,” “facility” means a state hospital or training center operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, including the buildings and land associated with it.

“Guardian”
means a person appointed by the court who has the powers and duties set out in §

64.2-2019

, or §

63.2-1609

if applicable, and who is responsible for the personal affairs of an incapacitated person, including responsibility for making decisions regarding the person’s support, care, health, safety, habilitation, education, therapeutic treatment, and, if not inconsistent with an order of involuntary admission, residence. Where the context plainly indicates, the term includes a “limited guardian” or a “temporary guardian.” The term includes (i) a local or regional program designated by the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services as a public guardian pursuant to Article 6 (§

51.5-149

et seq.) of Chapter 14 of Title 51.5 or (ii) any local or regional tax-exempt charitable organization established pursuant to § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code to provide guardian services to incapacitated persons. Such tax-exempt charitable organization shall not be a provider of direct services to the incapacitated person. If a tax-exempt charitable organization has been designated by the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services as a public guardian, it may also serve as a guardian for other individuals.

“Guardian ad litem”
means an attorney appointed by the court to represent the interests of the respondent and whose duties include evaluation of the petition for guardianship or conservatorship and filing a report with the court pursuant to §

64.2-2003

.

“Incapacitated person”
means an adult who has been found by a court to be incapable of receiving and evaluating information effectively or responding to people, events, or environments to such an extent that the individual lacks the capacity to (i) meet the essential requirements for his health, care, safety, or therapeutic needs without the assistance or protection of a guardian or (ii) manage property or financial affairs or provide for his support or for the support of his legal dependents without the assistance or protection of a conservator. A finding that the individual displays poor judgment alone shall not be considered sufficient evidence that the individual is an incapacitated person within the meaning of this definition. A finding that a person is incapacitated shall be construed as a finding that the person is “mentally incompetent” as that term is used in Article II, Section 1 of the Constitution of Virginia and Title 24.2 unless the court order entered pursuant to this chapter specifically provides otherwise.

“Individualized education plan”
or

“IEP”

means a plan or program developed annually to ensure that a child who has a disability identified under the law and is attending an elementary or secondary educational institution receives specialized instruction and related services as provided by 20 U.S.C. § 1414.

“Individual receiving services”
or

“individual”

means a current direct recipient of public or private mental health, developmental, or substance abuse treatment, rehabilitation, or habilitation services and includes the terms “consumer,” “patient,” “resident,” “recipient,” or “client.”

“Limited conservator”
means a person appointed by the court who has only those responsibilities for managing the estate and financial affairs of an incapacitated person as specified in the order of appointment.

“Limited guardian”
means a person appointed by the court who has only those responsibilities for the personal affairs of an incapacitated person as specified in the order of appointment.

“Mental illness”
means a disorder of thought, mood, emotion, perception, or orientation that significantly impairs judgment, behavior, capacity to recognize reality, or ability to address basic life necessities and requires care and treatment for the health, safety, or recovery of the individual or for the safety of others.

“Petition”
means the document filed with a circuit court to initiate a proceeding to appoint a guardian or conservator.

“Power of attorney”
has the same meaning ascribed to it in §

64.2-1600

.

“Property”
includes both real and personal property.

“Respondent”
means an allegedly incapacitated person for whom a petition for guardianship or conservatorship has been filed.

“Supported decision-making agreement”
has the same meaning ascribed to it in §

37.2-314.3

.

“Temporary conservator”
means a person appointed by a court for a limited duration of time as specified in the order of appointment.

“Temporary guardian”
means a person appointed by a court for a limited duration of time as specified in the order of appointment.

“Transition plan”
means the plan that is required as part of the IEP used to help students and families prepare for the future after the student reaches the age of majority.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.6; 1998, cc. 582, 787; 2004, c. 858; 2005, c. 716, §

37.2-1000

; 2006, c. 724; 2012, cc. 614, 803, 835; 2020, c. 855; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 232.

Cross references.

As to the Public Guardian and Conservator Advisory Board, see §§

51.5-149.1

,

51.5-149.2

.

As to security freezes for protected consumers, see § 59.1-444.3.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1997, c. 921, which enacted former §

37.2-1000

, in cl. 2 provides: “That this act shall become effective January 1, 1998. The powers granted and duties imposed pursuant to this act shall apply prospectively to guardians and conservators appointed by court order entered on or after that date, or modified on or after that date if the court so directs, without regard to when the petition was filed. The procedures specified in this act governing proceedings for appointment of a guardian or conservator or termination or other modification of a guardianship or conservatorship shall apply on and after that date without regard to when the petition therefor was filed or the guardianship or conservatorship created.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, amended former §

37.2-1000

, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2012, c. 614, cl. 4, the 2012 amendments by Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59,
have been given effect in this section by substituting “Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services” for “Department for the Aging” four times and substituting “Article 6 (§

51.5-149

et seq.) of Chapter 14 of Title 51.5” for “Article 2 (§ 2.2-711 et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 2.2” twice.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission the definition for “Individual receiving services” was substituted for the definition of “consumer” to conform to amendments by Acts 2012, cc. 476 and 507.

Acts 2020, c. 855, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services (the Department) shall convene a group of stakeholders to study the use of supported decision-making agreements in the Commonwealth, including making recommendations as to the use of supported decision-making agreements as a less restrictive alternative to the appointment of a guardian or conservator for an incapacitated person. The Department shall report the findings and recommendations of the stakeholder group’s study to the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary and the House Committee on Health, Welfare, and Institutions no later than November 1, 2020.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 855, in the definition of “Advance directive,” substituted “§

54.1-2982

” for “the Health Care Decisions Act (§

54.1-2981

et seq.)”; inserted the definition of “Annual report,” “Guardian ad litem,” “Individual receiving services,” “Petition,” “Power of attorney,” “Temporary conservator,” “Temporary guardian,” and “Transition plan”; in the definition of “Conservator,” substituted “ ‘Conservator’ ” for “The term” in the second sentence at the beginning; in the definition for “Guardian,” inserted “has the powers and duties set out in §

64.2-2019

, or §

63.2-1609

if applicable, and who” in the first sentence.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 232, effective July 1, 2021, added the definition of “Supported decision-making agreement.”

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 1-106 Style and Commencement of Action by Conservator of Incapacitated Person; No. 6-700 Information Pamphlet: Guardianship and Conservatorship Proceedings Regarding Incapacitated Adults, et seq.; No. 6-801 Complaint by Conservator to Sell Land of Person Under Disability, et seq.; No. 15-408 Memorandum of Facts — Incapacitated Adult.

§ 64.2-2001.
Filing of petition; jurisdiction; instructions to be provided.

A petition for the appointment of a guardian or conservator shall be filed with the circuit court of the county or city in which the respondent is a resident or is located or in which the respondent resided immediately prior to becoming a patient, voluntarily or involuntarily, in a hospital, including a hospital licensed by the Department of Health pursuant to §

32.1-123

, or a resident in a nursing facility or nursing home, convalescent home, assisted living facility as defined in §

63.2-100

, or any other similar institution or, if the petition is for the appointment of a conservator for a nonresident with property in the state, in the city or county in which the respondent’s property is located.

Article 2 (§

64.2-2105

et seq.) of the Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act provides the exclusive jurisdictional basis for a court of the Commonwealth to appoint a guardian or conservator for an adult.

Where the petition is brought by a parent or guardian of a respondent who is under the age of 18, or by any other person and there is no living parent or guardian of a respondent who is under the age of 18, the petition may be filed no earlier than six months prior to the respondent’s eighteenth birthday. Where such a petition is brought, a court may enter an order appointing the parent or guardian of the respondent, or other person if there is no living parent or guardian, as guardian or conservator prior to the respondent’s eighteenth birthday. Such order shall specify whether it takes effect immediately upon entry or on the respondent’s eighteenth birthday. Where the petition is brought by any other person and there is a living parent or guardian of a respondent who is under the age of 18, the petition may be filed no earlier than the respondent’s eighteenth birthday.

Instructions regarding the duties, powers, and liabilities of guardians and conservators shall be provided to each clerk of court by the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court, and the clerk shall provide such information to each guardian and conservator upon notice of appointment.

The circuit court in which the proceeding is first commenced may order a transfer of venue if it would be in the best interest of the respondent.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.7; 2001, c. 274; 2002, c. 736; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1001; 2006, c. 552; 2011, c. 518; 2012, c. 614; 2013, c. 523; 2016, c. 31.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 523, in subsection C, inserted “or by any other person and there is no living parent or guardian of a respondent who is under the age of 18” in the first sentence and “and there is a living parent or guardian of a respondent who is under the age of 18” in the second sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 31 added the second and third sentences in subsection B.

§ 64.2-2002.
Who may file petition; contents.

Any person, including a community services board and any other local or state governmental agency, may file a petition for the appointment of a guardian, a conservator, or both.

A petition for the appointment of a guardian, a conservator, or both, shall state the petitioner’s name, place of residence, post office address, and relationship, if any, to the respondent and, to the extent known as of the date of filing, shall include the following:

The respondent’s name, date of birth, place of residence or location, post office address, and the sealed filing of the social security number;

The basis for the court’s jurisdiction under the provisions of Article 2 (§

64.2-2105

et seq.) of Chapter 21;

The names and post office addresses of the respondent’s spouse, adult children, parents, and adult siblings or, if no such relatives are known to the petitioner, at least three other known relatives of the respondent, including stepchildren. If a total of three such persons cannot be identified and located, the petitioner shall certify that fact in the petition, and the court shall set forth such finding in the final order;

The name, place of residence or location, and post office address of the individual or facility, if any, that is responsible for or has assumed responsibility for the respondent’s care or custody;

The name, place of residence or location, and post office address of any agent designated under a durable power of attorney or an advance directive of which the respondent is the principal, and any guardian, committee, or conservator currently acting, whether in this state or elsewhere, and the petitioner shall attach a copy of any such durable power of attorney, advance directive, or order appointing the guardian, committee, or conservator, if available;

The type of guardianship or conservatorship requested and a brief description of the nature and extent of the respondent’s alleged incapacity;

When the petition requests appointment of a guardian, a brief description of the services currently being provided for the respondent’s health, care, safety, or rehabilitation and, where appropriate, a recommendation as to living arrangements and treatment plan;

If the appointment of a limited guardian is requested, the specific areas of protection and assistance to be included in the order of appointment and, if the appointment of a limited conservator is requested, the specific areas of management and assistance to be included in the order of appointment;

The name and post office address of any proposed guardian or conservator or any guardian or conservator nominated by the respondent and that person’s relationship to the respondent;

The native language of the respondent and any necessary alternative mode of communication;

A statement of the financial resources of the respondent that shall, to the extent known, list the approximate value of the respondent’s property and the respondent’s anticipated annual gross income, other receipts, and debts;

A statement of whether the petitioner believes that the respondent’s attendance at the hearing would be detrimental to the respondent’s health, care, or safety; and

A request for appointment of a guardian ad litem.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.8; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1002; 2006, c. 471; 2012, c. 614; 2013, c. 523; 2022, c. 630.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 523 added subdivision B 2 and redesignated accordingly; in subdivision B 5, substituted “and any guardian” for “or any guardian,” and inserted “or order appointing the guardian, committee, or conservator.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 630 inserted “including a community services board and any other local or state governmental agency” in subsection A; and made stylistic changes.

§ 64.2-2003.
Appointment of guardian ad litem.

On the filing of every petition for guardianship or conservatorship, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the interests of the respondent. The guardian ad litem shall be paid a fee that is fixed by the court to be paid by the petitioner or taxed as costs, as the court directs.

Duties of the guardian ad litem include (i) personally visiting the respondent; (ii) advising the respondent of rights pursuant to §§

64.2-2006

and

64.2-2007

and certifying to the court that the respondent has been so advised; (iii) recommending that legal counsel be appointed for the respondent, pursuant to §

64.2-2006

, if the guardian ad litem believes that counsel for the respondent is necessary; (iv) notifying the court as soon as practicable if the respondent requests counsel regardless of whether the guardian ad litem recommends counsel; (v) investigating the petition and evidence, requesting additional evaluation if necessary, considering whether a less restrictive alternative to guardianship or conservatorship is available, including the use of an advance directive, supported decision-making agreement, or durable power of attorney, and filing a report pursuant to subsection C; and (vi) personally appearing at all court proceedings and conferences. If the respondent is between 17 and a half and 21 years of age and has an Individualized Education Plan (IEP) and transition plan, the guardian ad litem shall review such IEP and transition plan and include the results of his review in the report required by clause (v).

In the report required by clause (v) of subsection B, the guardian ad litem shall address the following major areas of concern: (i) whether the court has jurisdiction; (ii) whether a guardian or conservator is needed based on evaluations and reviews conducted pursuant to subsection B; (iii) the extent of the duties and powers of the guardian or conservator; (iv) the propriety and suitability of the person selected as guardian or conservator after consideration of the person’s geographic location, familial or other relationship with the respondent, ability to carry out the powers and duties of the office, commitment to promoting the respondent’s welfare, any potential conflicts of interests, wishes of the respondent, and recommendations of relatives; (v) a recommendation as to the amount of surety on the conservator’s bond, if any; and (vi) consideration of proper residential placement of the respondent. The report shall also contain an explanation by the guardian ad litem as to any (a) decision not to recommend the appointment of counsel for the respondent, (b) determination that a less restrictive alternative to guardianship or conservatorship is not advisable, and (c) determination that appointment of a limited guardian or conservator is not appropriate.

A health care provider and local school division shall disclose or make available to the guardian ad litem, upon request, any information, records, and reports concerning the respondent that the guardian ad litem determines necessary to perform his duties under this section.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.9; 2004, cc. 66, 1014; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1003; 2012, c. 614; 2020, cc. 581, 855; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 232; 2022, cc. 243, 381.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 855, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services (the Department) shall convene a group of stakeholders to study the use of supported decision-making agreements in the Commonwealth, including making recommendations as to the use of supported decision-making agreements as a less restrictive alternative to the appointment of a guardian or conservator for an incapacitated person. The Department shall report the findings and recommendations of the stakeholder group’s study to the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary and the House Committee on Health, Welfare, and Institutions no later than November 1, 2020.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 581, added the last sentence in subsection A; and in subsection D, inserted “and local school division.”

The 2020 amendment by c. 855, in subsection B, inserted “considering whether a less restrictive alternative to guardianship or conservatorship is available, including the use of an advance directive or durable power of attorney” in the first sentence, clause (iv) and added the last sentence; in subsection C, inserted “based on evaluations and reviews conducted pursuant to subsection B” in clause (ii); and in subsection D, inserted “and local school division.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 232, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “supported decision-making agreement” in clause (iv) of subsection B.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 243 and 381 are identical, and added clause (iv) in subsection B and redesignated accordingly; in subsections B and C, substituted “clause (v)” for “clause (iv)”; added the last sentence in subsection C; and made a stylistic change.

§ 64.2-2004.
Notice of hearing; jurisdictional.

Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall promptly set a date, time, and location for a hearing. The respondent shall be given reasonable notice of the hearing. The respondent may not waive notice, and a failure to properly notify the respondent shall be jurisdictional.

A respondent, whether or not he resides in the Commonwealth, shall be personally served with the notice of the hearing, a copy of the petition, and a copy of the order appointing a guardian ad litem pursuant to §

64.2-2003

. A certification, in the guardian ad litem’s report required by subsection B of §

64.2-2003

, that the guardian ad litem personally served the respondent with the notice, a copy of the petition, and a copy of the order appointing a guardian ad litem shall constitute valid personal service for purposes of this section.

A copy of the notice, together with a copy of the petition, shall be mailed by first-class mail by the petitioner at least 10 days before the hearing to all adult individuals and to all entities whose names and post office addresses appear in the petition. The court, for good cause shown, may waive the advance notice required by this subsection. If the advance notice is waived, the petitioner shall promptly mail by first-class mail a copy of the petition and any order entered to those individuals and entities.

Any adult individual or entity whose name and post office addresses appear in the petition may become a party to the proceeding by filing a pleading in accordance with Rule 1:4 of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Virginia. Such individual or entity shall mail his pleadings via first-class mail to the petitioner, any counsel of record, the guardian ad litem, and all other adult individuals and entities whose names and post office addresses appear in the petition. Such pleading may also be sent via electronic mail or facsimile to all counsel of record and the guardian ad litem, as well as those other adult individuals and entities whose email addresses or facsimile numbers are known to the person filing the pleading. If a cross-petition is filed, the petitioner shall file a response to such cross-petition.

The notice shall include a brief statement in at least 14-point type of the purpose of the proceedings and shall inform the respondent of the right to be represented by counsel pursuant to §

64.2-2006

and to a hearing pursuant to §

64.2-2007

. Additionally, the notice shall include the following statement in conspicuous, bold print.

WARNING TO THE RESPONDENT

AT THE HEARING YOU MAY LOSE MANY OF YOUR RIGHTS. A GUARDIAN MAY BE APPOINTED TO MAKE PERSONAL DECISIONS FOR YOU. A CONSERVATOR MAY BE APPOINTED TO MAKE DECISIONS CONCERNING YOUR PROPERTY AND FINANCES. THE APPOINTMENT MAY AFFECT CONTROL OF HOW YOU SPEND YOUR MONEY, HOW YOUR PROPERTY IS MANAGED AND CONTROLLED, WHO MAKES YOUR MEDICAL DECISIONS, WHERE YOU LIVE, WHETHER YOU ARE ALLOWED TO VOTE, AND OTHER IMPORTANT RIGHTS.

NOTIFICATION TO OTHERS

ANY ADULT INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY WHOSE NAME AND POST OFFICE ADDRESSES APPEAR IN THE PETITION FOR APPOINTMENT MAY BECOME A PARTY TO THIS ACTION BY FILING A PLEADING WITH THE CIRCUIT COURT IN WHICH THIS CASE IS PENDING. THAT PLEADING MUST BE MAILED TO THE PETITIONER, ANY COUNSEL OF RECORD, THE GUARDIAN AD LITEM, AND ALL OTHER ADULT INDIVIDUALS AND ENTITIES WHOSE NAMES AND POST OFFICE ADDRESSES APPEAR IN THE PETITION. IN ADDITION, SUCH PLEADING MAY BE SENT BY EMAIL OR FAX TO ANY SUCH OTHER ADULT INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY FOR WHOM SUCH EMAIL ADDRESS OR FAX NUMBER IS KNOWN.

The petitioner shall file with the clerk of the circuit court a statement of compliance with subsections B, C, and E. Certification of personal service made by the guardian ad litem as required by subsection B may satisfy this requirement as to compliance with subsection B.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.10; 2001, c. 30; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1004; 2012, c. 614; 2022, cc. 278, 381.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by cc. 278 and 381 are identical, and substituted “10 days” for “seven days” in the first sentence of subsection C; redesignated former subsection E as current subsection D and redesignated accordingly; added subsection D; deleted “to the respondent” following “notice” in the first sentence of subsection E; added “TO THE RESPONDENT” in the second paragraph of subsection E; added the fourth and fifth paragraphs of subsection E; and, in subsection F, substituted “E” for “D” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

§ 64.2-2005.
Evaluation report.

A report evaluating the condition of the respondent shall be filed, under seal, with the court and provided to the guardian ad litem, the respondent, and all adult individuals and all entities to whom notice is required under subsection C of §

64.2-2004

within a reasonable time prior to the hearing on the petition. The report shall be prepared by one or more licensed physicians or psychologists or licensed professionals skilled in the assessment and treatment of the physical or mental conditions of the respondent as alleged in the petition. If a report is not available, the court may proceed to hold the hearing without the report for good cause shown, absent any objection by the guardian ad litem, or may order a report and delay the hearing until the report is prepared, filed, and provided.

The report shall evaluate the condition of the respondent and shall contain, to the best information and belief of its signatory:

A description of the nature, type, and extent of the respondent’s incapacity, including the respondent’s specific functional impairments;

A diagnosis or assessment of the respondent’s mental and physical condition, including a statement as to whether the individual is on any medications that may affect his actions or demeanor, and, where appropriate and consistent with the scope of the evaluator’s license, an evaluation of the respondent’s ability to learn self-care skills, adaptive behavior, and social skills and a prognosis for improvement;

The date or dates of the examinations, evaluations, and assessments upon which the report is based; and

The signature of the person conducting the evaluation and the nature of the professional license held by that person.

In the absence of bad faith or malicious intent, a person performing the evaluation shall be immune from civil liability for any breach of patient confidentiality made in furtherance of his duties under this section.

A report prepared pursuant to this section shall be admissible as evidence in open court of the facts stated in the report and the results of the examination or evaluation referred to in the report, unless counsel for the respondent or the guardian ad litem objects.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.11; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1005; 2012, c. 614; 2014, c. 402.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 402, in subsection A, inserted “under seal” and “the respondent, and all adult individuals and all entities to whom notice is required under subsection C of §

64.2-2004

” in the first sentence, and deleted “to the guardian ad litem” from the end; and in subsection D, inserted “in open court.”

§ 64.2-2006.
Counsel for respondent.

The respondent has the right to be represented by counsel of the respondent’s choice. If the respondent is not represented by counsel, the court may appoint legal counsel upon the filing of the petition or at any time prior to the entry of the order upon request of the respondent or the guardian ad litem, if the court determines that counsel is needed to protect the respondent’s interest. Counsel appointed by the court shall be paid a fee that is fixed by the court to be taxed as part of the costs of the proceeding.

A health care provider shall disclose or make available to the attorney, upon request, any information, records, and reports concerning the respondent that the attorney determines necessary to perform his duties under this section, including a copy of the evaluation report required under §

64.2-2005

.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.12; 2004, cc. 66, 1014; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1006; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-2007.
Hearing on petition to appoint.

The respondent is entitled to a jury trial upon request, and may compel the attendance of witnesses, present evidence on his own behalf, and confront and cross-examine witnesses.

The court or the jury, if a jury is requested, shall hear the petition for the appointment of a guardian or conservator. The hearing may be held at such convenient place as the court directs, including the place where the respondent is located. The hearing shall be conducted within 120 days from the filing of the petition unless the court postpones it for cause. The proposed guardian or conservator shall attend the hearing except for good cause shown and, where appropriate, shall provide the court with a recommendation as to living arrangements and a treatment plan for the respondent. The respondent is entitled to be present at the hearing and all other stages of the proceedings. The respondent shall be present if he so requests or if his presence is requested by the guardian ad litem. Whether or not present, the respondent shall be regarded as having denied the allegations in the petition.

In determining the need for a guardian or a conservator and the powers and duties of any guardian or conservator, if needed, consideration shall be given to the following factors: (i) the limitations of the respondent; (ii) the development of the respondent’s maximum self-reliance and independence; (iii) the availability of less restrictive alternatives, including advance directives, supported decision-making agreements, and durable powers of attorney; (iv) the extent to which it is necessary to protect the respondent from neglect, exploitation, or abuse; (v) the actions needed to be taken by the guardian or conservator; (vi) the suitability of the proposed guardian or conservator; and (vii) the best interests of the respondent.

If, after considering the evidence presented at the hearing, the court or jury determines on the basis of clear and convincing evidence that the respondent is incapacitated and in need of a guardian or conservator, the court shall appoint a suitable person, who may be the spouse of the respondent, to be the guardian or the conservator or both, giving due deference to the wishes of the respondent. If a guardian or conservator is appointed, the court shall inform him of his duties and powers pursuant to Article 2 (§

64.2-2019

et seq.) and shall further inform the guardian or conservator that, to the extent feasible, the respondent should be encouraged to participate in decisions, act on his own behalf, and develop or maintain the capacity to manage his personal affairs if he retains any decision-making rights. Except for good cause shown, including a determination by the court that there is no acceptable alternative available to serve, the court shall not appoint as guardian or conservator for the respondent an attorney who has been engaged by the petitioner to represent the petitioner within three calendar years of the appointment. Such prohibition also applies to all other attorneys and employees of the law firm with which such attorney is associated. The court shall require the proposed guardian or conservator to certify at the time of appointment that he has disclosed to the court any such representation of the petitioner or association with a law firm that represented the petitioner within the three calendar years preceding the appointment. Compensation paid by a petitioner to an attorney or law firm for serving as a guardian or conservator shall not constitute representation of the petitioner by such attorney or law firm. In the case of a petitioner that is a medical care facility as defined in §

32.1-102.1

, the court may, for good cause shown, order that the reasonable costs for the guardian or conservator be paid by the petitioner during the time the respondent is under the care of such medical care facility.The court in its order shall make specific findings of fact and conclusions of law in support of each provision of any orders entered. The order of appointment shall be made in a form that complies with the requirements set out in §

64.2-2009

.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.13; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1007; 2009, c. 433; 2012, c. 614; 2013, c. 523; 2020, cc. 649, 855; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 232.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 855, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services (the Department) shall convene a group of stakeholders to study the use of supported decision-making agreements in the Commonwealth, including making recommendations as to the use of supported decision-making agreements as a less restrictive alternative to the appointment of a guardian or conservator for an incapacitated person. The Department shall report the findings and recommendations of the stakeholder group’s study to the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary and the House Committee on Health, Welfare, and Institutions no later than November 1, 2020.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 523 added the third sentence in subsection B; and added “and (vii) the best interests of the respondent” at the end of subsection C.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 649 added the last five sentences in subsection D.

The 2020 amendment by c. 855, in subsection D, added the second sentence in the first paragraph and the last sentence in the final paragraph.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 232, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “supported decision-making agreements” in clause (iii) of subsection C.

§ 64.2-2008.
Fees and costs.

The petitioner shall pay the filing fee set forth in subdivision A 42 of §

17.1-275

and costs. Service fees and court costs may be waived by the court if it is alleged under oath that the estate of the respondent is unavailable or insufficient. If a guardian or conservator is appointed and the court finds that the petition is brought in good faith and for the benefit of the respondent, the court shall order that the petitioner be reimbursed from the estate for all reasonable costs and fees if the estate of the incapacitated person is available and sufficient to reimburse the petitioner. If a guardian or conservator is not appointed and the court nonetheless finds that the petition is brought in good faith and for the benefit of the respondent, the court may direct the respondent’s estate, if available and sufficient, to reimburse the petitioner for all reasonable costs and fees. The court may require the petitioner to pay or reimburse all or some of the respondent’s reasonable costs and fees and any other costs incurred under this chapter if the court finds that the petitioner initiated a proceeding under this chapter that was in bad faith or not for the benefit of the respondent.

In any proceeding filed pursuant to this article, if the adult subject of the petition is determined to be indigent, any fees and costs of the proceeding that are fixed by the court or taxed as costs shall be borne by the Commonwealth.

History.

1998, c. 76, § 37.1-134.13:1; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1008; 2012, c. 614; 2013, c. 523; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 427.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 523, in subsection A, inserted “reasonable” in the third and fourth sentences, inserted “and the court finds that the petition is brought in good faith and for the benefit of the respondent” in the third sentence, and added the last sentence.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 427, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “subdivision A 42” for “subdivision A 43” in the first sentence of subsection A.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Fees. —

Considering the apparent hostility in this family, it was reasonable for petitioner to believe that appointment of a neutral third party guardian would better serve respondents’ interests, and the orders appointing a guardian provided that those fees were to be paid out of respondents’ estate; respondents’ motion to order petitioner to pay the fees was denied. Culp v. Bryant, 94 Va. Cir. 451, 2016 Va. Cir. LEXIS 178 (Chesapeake Nov. 4, 2016).